Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-121 False exhibits. Every
person who, with intent to deceive knowingly exhibits any false account,
document or advertisement, relative to the affairs of any insurer, or of any
corporation of the kind enumerated in section 431:4-107, formed or proposed to
be formed, is punishable in accordance with section 431:2-203. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next